Nebraska, session 109, LB1094.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1094 LB1094
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the By-Right Housing Development Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the By-Right Housing Development Act:
(1) Accessory dwelling unit means a secondary housing unit that is
subordinate to the primary dwelling unit on the same lot and may include
a separate kitchen, bathroom, and entrance;
(2) Multifamily housing unit means a residential building containing
two or more housing units, such as apartment buildings, condominiums, or
townhouses;
(3) Permitting authority means the governmental entity responsible
for issuing permits for housing developments within such governmental
entity's jurisdiction; and
(4) Single-family home means a dwelling, either detached or semi-
detached, that is arranged, intended, or designed to be occupied by a
single family.
Sec. 3. All proposed housing developments, including single-family
homes, accessory dwelling units, and multifamily housing units, that meet
the criteria outlined in applicable zoning codes and land use regulations
shall be approved by right, without the need for discretionary review or
approval by any planning commission, zoning board, or other regulatory
authority.
Sec. 4. (1) Regulatory authorities shall monitor housing
developments that were approved by right pursuant to section 3 of this
act to ensure compliance with applicable regulations and standards.
(2) A housing development's noncompliance with applicable
regulations and standards may result in enforcement actions, such as
fines, penalties, or project modifications to bring the development into
compliance.
Sec. 5. Nothing in the By-Right Housing Development Act shall be
construed to invalidate or limit the legality, enforceability, or effect
of any restrictive covenants or any regulations of a condominium
-2-

LB1094 LB1094
2026 2026
association or homeowners' association. Courts shall recognize and
enforce such covenants and regulations in accordance with applicable
laws.
Sec. 6. (1) If a permitting authority denies a permit for a housing
development, the applicant whose permit was denied may appeal the
decision to the district court. On appeal, the court shall review the
decision of the permitting authority de novo. The inquiry in such a case
shall extend to the questions of (a) whether the permitting authority
proceeded without jurisdiction or in excess of its jurisdiction, (b)
whether there was a fair process, and (c) whether there was any abuse of
discretion.
(2) Abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that
the permitting authority's findings are not supported by clear and
convincing evidence in light of the whole record.
(3) If the court overturns the denial, the court may remand the case
to the permitting authority or may direct the permitting authority to
grant the permit.
(4) The court retains authority to grant equitable relief where
appropriate and shall award the successful applicant attorney's fees and
expenses. In no case shall attorney's fees or expenses be awarded to the
permitting authority or any third party challenging a permit.
Sec. 7. Sections 7 to 11 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Permitting Approval Timeliness Act.
Sec. 8. For purposes of the Permitting Approval Timeliness Act:
(1) Applicant means any individual, organization, or entity
submitting a permit application for review and approval;
(2) Permit application means an application for a permit that is
required to develop real property or to make improvements to real
property; and
(3) Permitting authority means the state or local governmental
entity responsible for reviewing permit applications and issuing permits
-3-

LB1094 LB1094
2026 2026
within such governmental entity's jurisdiction.
Sec. 9. (1) A permitting authority shall process permit
applications in a timely manner and shall issue a decision on a complete
permit application within seventy-five days after its submission.
(2) If a permitting authority fails to issue a decision within
seventy-five days after submission of a complete permit application, the
permit shall be automatically granted to the applicant.
Sec. 10. (1) If a permitting authority denies a permit application
or approves a permit application with conditions, the permitting
authority shall provide the applicant with specific reasons for the
denial or conditional approval. The permitting authority need not give a
reason for its approval of a permit application.
(2) The reasons for denial or conditional approval shall be based on
applicable laws and regulations clearly established for the issuance of
the relevant permit.
Sec. 11. (1) An applicant may appeal a decision of the permitting
authority to the district court. Other parties shall not have standing to
appeal the decision. On appeal, the court shall review the decision of
the permitting authority de novo. The inquiry in such a case shall extend
to the questions of (a) whether the permitting authority proceeded
without jurisdiction or in excess of its jurisdiction, (b) whether there
was a fair process, and (c) whether there was any abuse of discretion.
(2) Abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that
the permitting authority's findings are not supported by clear and
convincing evidence in light of the whole record.
(3) If the court overturns the denial or rejects the conditions of
approval, the court shall direct the permitting authority to grant the
permit.
(4) The court retains authority to grant equitable relief where
appropriate and shall award the successful applicant attorney's fees and
expenses. In no case shall attorney's fees or expenses be awarded to the
-4-

LB1094 LB1094
2026 2026
permitting authority.
-5-